Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross References

Hawaii hurricane
relief fund, see chapter 431P.

Other disaster relief
provisions, see chapter 127 and chapter 171, pt IIIC.

Tax relief, see
§§235-7 and 237-24.7.

§209-1 Definitions. As used in this chapter:

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Commodity" means any good or service
necessary for the health, safety, and welfare of the people of Hawaii; provided
that this term shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Materials;

(2) Merchandise;

(3) Supplies;

(4) Equipment;

(5) Resources; and

(6) Other articles of commerce that shall include,
without limitation, the following:

(A) Food;

(B) Water;

(C) Ice;

(D) Chemicals;

(E) Petroleum products;

(F) Construction materials; or

(G) Residential dwellings.

"Coordinator" means the
rehabilitation coordinator provided for in section 209-4.

"Director" means the director of
business, economic development, and tourism.

"Rehabilitation area" means any area
of the State struck by a state disaster and declared to be in need of
rehabilitation by the governor pursuant to section 209-2.

"Residential dwelling unit" means any
single or multifamily residence where the occupants pay rent to an owner or
landlord, for the right to occupy and live on the property.

"Severe weather warning" means the
issuance by the National Weather Service of a public notification that a
dangerous weather condition exists that could impact the State, or any portion
of it, within a specified period of time. This term includes but is not
limited to, warnings of coastal inundation (high surf), flash flooding,
tsunami, or hurricane.

"Small Business Administration" means
the Small Business Administration of the United States.

"State disaster" means any unfortunate,
sudden, and extraordinary occurrence declared by the governor pursuant to
section 209-2 to have caused losses and suffering of such character and
magnitude as to require and justify rehabilitative assistance from the State.
[L 1961, c 189, §2; am L 1963, c 2, §3; Supp, §98P-2; HRS §209-1; am L 1987, c
336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8; am L 1993, c 333, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next